HunSpellDictionaries/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  11581 Y 1
SFX  11581 0 ביהן/64991 .
SFX  9773 Y 1
SFX  9773 0 יקוהו/64992 .
SFX  6168 Y 1
SFX  6168 0 ייך/64991 .
SFX  8128 Y 1
SFX  8128 0 ייך/64992 .
SFX  5288 Y 1
SFX  5288 0 ביהן/64993 .
SFX  7217 Y 1
SFX  7217 0 ניה/64991 .
SFX  13525 Y 1
SFX  13525 0 ניה/64992 .
SFX  11933 Y 1
SFX  11933 ם ממו/64992 .
SFX  5342 Y 1
SFX  5342 0 ייך/64993 .
SFX  5133 Y 1
SFX  5133 0 ניה/64993 .
SFX  10174 Y 1
SFX  10174 0 קוכם/64992 .
SFX  7977 Y 1
SFX  7977 0 ניה/64994 .
SFX  8923 Y 1
SFX  8923 0 דתיכם/64992 .
SFX  5530 Y 1
SFX  5530 0 ונותיהן/64993 .
SFX  9162 Y 1
SFX  9162 0 ריהם/64991 .
SFX  5477 Y 1
SFX  5477 0 ריהם/64993 .
SFX  13784 Y 1
SFX  13784 0 עלי/64992 .
SFX  12474 Y 1
SFX  12474 0 עלי/64993 .
SFX  11308 Y 1
SFX  11308 0 עלי/64995 .
SFX  7346 Y 1
SFX  7346 0 ושים/64991 .
SFX  12467 Y 1
SFX  12467 0 יעתה/64991 .
SFX  5478 Y 1
SFX  5478 0 ונה/64991 .
SFX  13750 Y 1
SFX  13750 0 חיהו/64992 .
SFX  9479 Y 1
SFX  9479 0 יעתה/64992 .
SFX  6716 Y 1
SFX  6716 0 ונה/64992 .
SFX  8711 Y 1
SFX  8711 0 יעתה/64993 .
SFX  5147 Y 1
SFX  5147 0 ונה/64993 .
SFX  9818 Y 1
SFX  9818 0 חיהו/64994 .
SFX  8832 Y 1
SFX  8832 0 לנוכם/64992 .
SFX  12276 Y 1
SFX  12276 0 יטים/64991 .
SFX  13789 Y 1
SFX  13789 0 יטים/64992 .
SFX  11914 Y 1
SFX  11914 0 עית/64991 .
SFX  9205 Y 1
SFX  9205 0 שיהם/64991 .
SFX  12830 Y 1
SFX  12830 0 צף/64991 .
SFX  9453 Y 1
SFX  9453 0 יטים/64994 .
SFX  12634 Y 1
SFX  12634 0 טיה/64991 .
SFX  8015 Y 1
SFX  8015 0 צף/64992 .
SFX  7006 Y 1
SFX  7006 0 שיהם/64993 .
SFX  13869 Y 1
SFX  13869 0 טיה/64992 .
SFX  7773 Y 1
SFX  7773 0 טיה/64993 .
SFX  10917 Y 1
SFX  10917 0 טיה/64994 .
SFX  9419 Y 1
SFX  9419 ן נתכן/64992 .
SFX  7347 Y 1
SFX  7347 0 ושיכן/64993 .
SFX  8201 Y 1
SFX  8201 0 חותנו/64993 .
SFX  11934 Y 1
SFX  11934 ז יר/64992 .
SFX  9772 Y 1
SFX  9772 0 יקוך/64992 .
SFX  6532 Y 1
SFX  6532 0 גים/64991 .
SFX  13727 Y 1
SFX  13727 0 גים/64992 .
SFX  6167 Y 1
SFX  6167 0 יהם/64991 .
SFX  7816 Y 1
SFX  7816 0 לו/64991 .
SFX  5709 Y 1
SFX  5709 0 יהם/64992 .
SFX  10918 Y 1
SFX  10918 0 גים/64994 .
SFX  6196 Y 1
SFX  6196 0 לו/64992 .
SFX  5167 Y 1
SFX  5167 0 ונייך/64993 .
SFX  5341 Y 1
SFX  5341 0 יהם/64993 .
SFX  5795 Y 1
SFX  5795 0 לו/64993 .
SFX  10173 Y 1
SFX  10173 0 קוכן/64992 .
SFX  10446 Y 1
SFX  10446 0 לו/64995 .
SFX  8922 Y 1
SFX  8922 0 דתיכן/64992 .
SFX  5529 Y 1
SFX  5529 0 ונותיו/64993 .
SFX  10103 Y 1
SFX  10103 0 לו/64999 .
SFX  9161 Y 1
SFX  9161 0 ריהן/64991 .
SFX  8246 Y 1
SFX  8246 0 מם/64991 .
SFX  5476 Y 1
SFX  5476 0 ריהן/64993 .
SFX  5031 Y 1
SFX  5031 0 מם/64992 .
SFX  6135 Y 1
SFX  6135 0 מם/64993 .
SFX  13542 Y 1
SFX  13542 0 זרי/64992 .
SFX  5568 Y 1
SFX  5568 0 זרי/64993 .
SFX  7056 Y 1
SFX  7056 0 מם/64998 .
SFX  7345 Y 1
SFX  7345 0 ושינו/64993 .
SFX  12466 Y 1
SFX  12466 0 יעתו/64991 .
SFX  13749 Y 1
SFX  13749 0 חיני/64992 .
SFX  9478 Y 1
SFX  9478 0 יעתו/64992 .
SFX  8710 Y 1
SFX  8710 0 יעתו/64993 .
SFX  9817 Y 1
SFX  9817 0 חיני/64994 .
SFX  8831 Y 1
SFX  8831 0 לנוכן/64992 .
SFX  13173 Y 1
SFX  13173 0 יץ/64991 .
SFX  5542 Y 1
SFX  5542 0 יץ/64992 .
SFX  10839 Y 1
SFX  10839 0 יץ/64993 .
SFX  9204 Y 1
SFX  9204 0 שיהן/64991 .
SFX  7005 Y 1
SFX  7005 0 שיהן/64993 .
SFX  7208 Y 1
SFX  7208 0 לי/64991 .
SFX  13524 Y 1
SFX  13524 0 לי/64992 .
SFX  10777 Y 1
SFX  10777 ן נתך/64992 .
SFX  9178 Y 1
SFX  9178 0 רותיה/64991 .
SFX  5794 Y 1
SFX  5794 0 לי/64993 .
SFX  10102 Y 1
SFX  10102 0 לי/64995 .
SFX  5758 Y 1
SFX  5758 0 רותיה/64993 .
SFX  7371 Y 1
SFX  7371 ן נס/64992 .
SFX  13808 Y 1
SFX  13808 0 לי/64999 .
SFX  13824 Y 1
SFX  13824 ד ירי/64992 .
SFX  12067 Y 1
SFX  12067 ד ירי/64993 .
SFX  10619 Y 1
SFX  10619 ד ירי/64995 .
SFX  9771 Y 1
SFX  9771 0 יקום/64992 .
SFX  6166 Y 1
SFX  6166 0 יהן/64991 .
SFX  8389 Y 1
SFX  8389 0 מנים/64991 .
SFX  7216 Y 1
SFX  7216 0 ע/64991 .
SFX  5708 Y 1
SFX  5708 0 יהן/64992 .
SFX  5457 Y 1
SFX  5457 0 ע/64992 .
SFX  5166 Y 1
SFX  5166 0 וניך/64993 .
SFX  5340 Y 1
SFX  5340 0 יהן/64993 .
SFX  9685 Y 1
SFX  9685 0 ע/64993 .
SFX  7484 Y 1
SFX  7484 0 קיות/64991 .
SFX  9427 Y 1
SFX  9427 0 ע/64994 .
SFX  8520 Y 1
SFX  8520 0 ע/64996 .
SFX  10371 Y 1
SFX  10371 0 ע/64997 .
SFX  9110 Y 1
SFX  9110 0 סינו/64991 .
SFX  5528 Y 1
SFX  5528 0 ונותיי/64993 .
SFX  13694 Y 1
SFX  13694 0 סינו/64992 .
SFX  5295 Y 1
SFX  5295 0 סינו/64993 .
SFX  10295 Y 1
SFX  10295 0 סינו/64994 .
SFX  9160 Y 1
SFX  9160 0 ריו/64991 .
SFX  5994 Y 1
SFX  5994 0 שותכם/64993 .
SFX  5475 Y 1
SFX  5475 0 ריו/64993 .
SFX  8829 Y 1
SFX  8829 0 לנון/64992 .
SFX  12961 Y 1
SFX  12961 0 חד/64991 .
SFX  7014 Y 1
SFX  7014 0 חד/64992 .
SFX  13563 Y 1
SFX  13563 ן קי/64992 .
SFX  9361 Y 1
SFX  9361 ם מתך/64992 .
SFX  7344 Y 1
SFX  7344 0 ושך/64993 .
SFX  12465 Y 1
SFX  12465 0 יעתך/64991 .
SFX  9477 Y 1
SFX  9477 0 יעתך/64992 .
SFX  8709 Y 1
SFX  8709 0 יעתך/64993 .
SFX  8830 Y 1
SFX  8830 0 לנום/64992 .
SFX  12666 Y 1
SFX  12666 0 ישו/64991 .
SFX  11704 Y 1
SFX  11704 0 ישו/64992 .
SFX  10226 Y 1
SFX  10226 0 ישו/64993 .
SFX  9203 Y 1
SFX  9203 0 שיו/64991 .
SFX  7004 Y 1
SFX  7004 0 שיו/64993 .
SFX  6164 Y 1
SFX  6164 0 יו/64991 .
SFX  8254 Y 1
SFX  8254 0 עות/64991 .
SFX  5925 Y 1
SFX  5925 0 יו/64992 .
SFX  5338 Y 1
SFX  5338 0 יו/64993 .
SFX  9379 Y 1
SFX  9379 0 ישו/64999 .
SFX  9177 Y 1
SFX  9177 0 רותיהם/64991 .
SFX  5757 Y 1
SFX  5757 0 רותיהם/64993 .
SFX  12624 Y 1
SFX  12624 ד ירך/64991 .
SFX  7793 Y 1
SFX  7793 ד ירך/64992 .
SFX  12382 Y 1
SFX  12382 0 יקות/64991 .
SFX  12992 Y 1
SFX  12992 ד לך/64991 .
SFX  11498 Y 1
SFX  11498 0 יר/64991 .
SFX  6165 Y 1
SFX  6165 0 יי/64991 .
SFX  5719 Y 1
SFX  5719 0 יר/64992 .
SFX  6325 Y 1
SFX  6325 ד לך/64992 .
SFX  10618 Y 1
SFX  10618 ד ירך/64998 .
SFX  9574 Y 1
SFX  9574 0 יר/64993 .
SFX  6178 Y 1
SFX  6178 ד לך/64993 .
SFX  5339 Y 1
SFX  5339 0 יי/64993 .
SFX  7483 Y 1
SFX  7483 0 קית/64991 .
SFX  8512 Y 1
SFX  8512 ד לך/64998 .
SFX  5527 Y 1
SFX  5527 0 ונותייך/64993 .
SFX  9159 Y 1
SFX  9159 0 רייך/64991 .
SFX  5993 Y 1
SFX  5993 0 שותכן/64993 .
SFX  8342 Y 1
SFX  8342 0 דו/64991 .
SFX  5474 Y 1
SFX  5474 0 רייך/64993 .
SFX  8828 Y 1
SFX  8828 0 לתוה/64992 .
SFX  6201 Y 1
SFX  6201 0 דו/64992 .
SFX  6977 Y 1
SFX  6977 0 דו/64993 .
SFX  10588 Y 1
SFX  10588 0 דו/64995 .
SFX  5883 Y 1
SFX  5883 0 פונו/64992 .
SFX  13989 Y 1
SFX  13989 ו חלי/64992 .
SFX  13395 Y 1
SFX  13395 0 פונו/64993 .
SFX  12804 Y 1
SFX  12804 0 דד/64991 .
SFX  9201 Y 1
SFX  9201 0 שיך/64991 .
SFX  5306 Y 1
SFX  5306 0 דד/64992 .
SFX  11894 Y 1
SFX  11894 0 קלו/64992 .
SFX  11863 Y 1
SFX  11863 ח ידוני/64992 .
SFX  11014 Y 1
SFX  11014 0 דד/64993 .
SFX  7002 Y 1
SFX  7002 0 שיך/64993 .
SFX  7055 Y 1
SFX  7055 0 דו/64999 .
SFX  9175 Y 1
SFX  9175 0 רותיו/64991 .
SFX  7343 Y 1
SFX  7343 0 ושכם/64993 .
SFX  5755 Y 1
SFX  5755 0 רותיו/64993 .
SFX  11466 Y 1
SFX  11466 0 קלו/64999 .
SFX  12623 Y 1
SFX  12623 ד ירכם/64991 .
SFX  7792 Y 1
SFX  7792 ד ירכם/64992 .
SFX  9202 Y 1
SFX  9202 0 שייך/64991 .
SFX  12776 Y 1
SFX  12776 ח יקכם/64991 .
SFX  6687 Y 1
SFX  6687 ח יקכם/64992 .
SFX  7003 Y 1
SFX  7003 0 שייך/64993 .
SFX  12248 Y 1
SFX  12248 ך כם/64991 .
SFX  8590 Y 1
SFX  8590 0 מא/64991 .
SFX  8232 Y 1
SFX  8232 ח יקכם/64993 .
SFX  6249 Y 1
SFX  6249 0 מא/64992 .
SFX  5041 Y 1
SFX  5041 ך כם/64992 .
SFX  10994 Y 1
SFX  10994 0 מא/64993 .
SFX  10617 Y 1
SFX  10617 ד ירכם/64998 .
SFX  9238 Y 1
SFX  9238 ך כם/64993 .
SFX  12966 Y 1
SFX  12966 ר שף/64991 .
SFX  9176 Y 1
SFX  9176 0 רותיהן/64991 .
SFX  7033 Y 1
SFX  7033 ר שף/64992 .
SFX  11322 Y 1
SFX  11322 ר שף/64993 .
SFX  5756 Y 1
SFX  5756 0 רותיהן/64993 .
SFX  11939 Y 1
SFX  11939 0 גל/64991 .
SFX  6350 Y 1
SFX  6350 ך כם/64998 .
SFX  5815 Y 1
SFX  5815 0 גל/64992 .
SFX  10979 Y 1
SFX  10979 0 גל/64993 .
SFX  5421 Y 1
SFX  5421 ך כם/64999 .
SFX  13157 Y 1
SFX  13157 ט ירך/64991 .
SFX  7876 Y 1
SFX  7876 ט ירך/64992 .
SFX  11136 Y 1
SFX  11136 ט ירך/64993 .
SFX  12777 Y 1
SFX  12777 ח יקך/64991 .
SFX  6688 Y 1
SFX  6688 ח יקך/64992 .
SFX  8233 Y 1
SFX  8233 ח יקך/64993 .
SFX  11411 Y 1
SFX  11411 ה ותי/64998 .
