HunSpellDictionaries/he_IL.dic
הזמי/5084,5094,5127,5128,5129,5130,5131,5132,5344,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5404,5405,5515,6095,6096,6322,6488,6489,7036,7207,7897,7976,7977,7978,7981,7982,7983,7984,7985,7986,7987,7988,7990,7991,7992,7993,7994,64995
הקשי/8854,8857,8858,9816,9817,9818,64994
הרכין/9280,9419,9420,9421,10776,64993
ישוו/5172,5542,9870,10037,10163,10164,10165,10166,10167,10168,10169,10173,10174,11496,11896,64992
מזוג/5082,5087,5093,5192,5194,5599,6498,6516,6526,6532,6543,64991
מטאורי/5079,5084,5093,5192,5193,5194,5333,5345,5346,5347,5348,5365,5366,5367,5368,5369,5370,7761,7762,7763,7764,7765,7766,7767,7768,7769,7770,7771,7772,7773,7774,7775,7776,7777,7778,7779,7780,7781,64991
מסדר/5147,5151,5152,5153,5154,5155,5156,5160,5161,5162,5163,5164,5165,5166,5167,5168,5169,5170,5510,5523,5524,5525,5526,5527,5528,5529,5530,5531,5532,64991
מעול/5082,5087,5093,5192,5194,5792,5794,5797,6068,6185,6186,6256,6818,6819,6820,7108,7223,7438,7441,7443,8215,8216,8243,8667,8760,9391,11100,12455,12474,12616,64996
מקדי/9200,9201,9202,9203,9204,9205,9206,9207,9208,9209,9210,9211,9212,9213,9214,9215,64995
מקלט/5463,5737,8106,9144,9145,9146,9147,9148,9149,9151,9152,9153,9154,9155,9156,9157,9158,9159,9160,9161,9162,9163,9164,9165,9166,9167,9168,9169,9170,9171,9172,9173,9174,9175,9176,9177,9178,9179,9180,64991
מרוות/5080,5089,5365,5655,6155,6156,6157,6158,6159,6160,6161,6162,6163,6164,6165,6166,6167,6168,64991
משול/5227,5232,5240,5470,5472,5797,5948,5949,5961,5965,5967,5968,6280,6501,6503,6504,6974,6976,6978,6980,6981,6982,6983,6984,6990,6991,6994,6995,6999,7002,7003,7004,7005,7006,7113,8211,11493,12806,64991
נירו/5478,5510,5564,6210,6212,6718,6724,6725,6729,6730,6731,6732,6733,6734,6735,6736,6737,6738,6739,6740,6741,6742,6743,6744,6745,8009,8010,8012,64993
נרו/5002,5028,5029,5031,5148,5193,5215,5216,5217,5218,5219,5220,5221,5222,5223,5224,5306,5308,5312,5318,5319,5381,5388,5390,5391,5392,5393,5395,5396,5491,5496,5735,5769,5952,6154,6281,6565,6716,6720,6792,6849,7577,7804,7805,8011,8014,8015,8016,64993
נתכן/5011,7371,7378,64991
סהר/5079,5084,5104,5105,5106,5147,5151,5152,5153,5154,5155,5156,5160,5161,5162,5163,5164,5165,5166,5167,5168,5169,5170,5192,5194,5333,5334,5335,5336,5337,5338,5339,5340,5341,5342,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,6470,7887,7894,7896,64991
סובי/12276,13366,13367,64993
קנו/5001,5003,5004,5005,5006,5007,5008,5080,5089,5125,5126,5143,5144,5145,5204,5208,5339,5636,5638,5939,6066,6115,6160,6413,6414,6415,6416,6417,6418,6419,6420,6421,6422,7217,7247,7402,8390,8391,8392,8393,8394,8395,8396,8397,8398,10380,64991
רוכס/5093,5125,5126,5127,5128,5129,5130,5131,5132,5133,5134,5135,5136,5138,5139,5140,5141,5142,5192,5193,5194,5372,64991
רחש/5079,5084,5192,5194,5333,5334,5335,5336,5337,5338,5339,5340,5341,5342,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,5371,5373,5374,5375,5599,7277,7335,7336,7337,7339,7340,7341,7342,7343,7344,7345,7346,7347,7348,7349,7350,7351,7352,7353,7354,7355,64991
ריבו/5349,5350,5351,5352,5353,5354,5355,5356,5357,6935,7193,7194,7195,7196,7197,7198,7199,7200,7201,7202,7203,7219,7222,7224,7225,7226,7227,7228,7229,7230,7232,7233,7234,7235,7236,7237,7238,7239,7240,7241,7802,8602,8603,8604,8605,8606,8607,8608,8609,8610,8611,11911,11914,64993
תזכיר/5008,5009,5028,5079,5084,5192,5194,5333,5334,5335,5336,5337,5338,5339,5340,5341,5342,5343,5344,5345,5346,5347,5348,5388,5389,5390,5391,5392,5393,5926,5927,5928,6822,64991
תמחו/5204,5444,5446,5447,5454,5456,5458,5459,5460,5461,5462,5465,5467,5468,5469,5471,5473,5474,5475,5476,5477,5736,8058,11767,11768,13825,13826,64992
תצפי/5001,5002,5004,5005,5006,5007,5008,5009,5093,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5399,5400,5401,5402,5403,5448,5449,5450,5451,5452,5453,5511,5515,5635,6822,7721,7725,7912,7988,7990,9239,11257,13523,13525,13526,13527,13538,13539,13540,13910,64992
תשבי/13748,13749,13750,64992
תתו/5006,5026,5064,5146,5148,5150,5320,5332,5487,5489,5499,5623,5693,5729,6194,6564,6577,6612,6720,7488,8136,8328,11496,11744,11777,11788,11894,13358,13534,13551,13561,13632,13633,13784,13807,13860,13862,64996
תתחם/8141,10069,11933,13911,64992
